stems/stems-yanshansin.lexc
LEXICON NounsAnYan
абый:абый            T1-N-AN ;
абыйзы:абыйзы          T1-N-AN ;
ада:ада             T3-N-AN ;
аксакал:аксакал         T2-N-AN ;
баба:баба            N-AN ;
байи:байи            T1-N-AN ;
банфан:банфан          T3-N-AN ;
бегэ:бегэ            T1-N-AN ;
бежын:бежын           T1-N-AN ;
бинжын:бинжын          T3-N-AN ;
богожын:богожын         T3-N-AN ;
бонбан:бонбан          T1-N-AN ;
бонзы:бонзы           N-AN ;
быйщин:быйщин          T1-N-AN ;
быйщюн:быйщюн          N-AN ;
бынгуй:бынгуй          T2-N-NN ;

LEXICON VerbsYan
бадё:бадё            T1-V ;
баже:баже            V ;
базун:базун           V ;
бан:бан             V ;
банван:банван          T3-V ;
банвандёли:банвандёли      V ;
бандо:бандо           T3-V ;
банлан:банлан          T3-V ;
банмэ:банмэ           T3-V ;
банчын:банчын          T3-V ;
бахуа:бахуа           T2-V ;
бе:бе              V ;
белан:белан           T3-V ;
биндё:биндё           T1-V ;
бо:бо              V ;
бон:бон             V ;
бондо:бондо           T2-V ;
бонцу:бонцу           T1-V ;
бочу:бочу            T3-V ;
быйфу:быйфу           T3-V ;
бёфэ:бёфэ            V ;

LEXICON AdjYan
бавынди:бавынди         T3-Adj ;
байирди:байирди         T3-Adj ;
байхўш:байхўш          T1-Adj ;
банди:банди           Adj ;
беди:беди            Adj ;
бинди:бинди           Adj ;
бичяра:бичяра          T1-Adj ;
буфа:буфа            Adj ;

LEXICON AdvYan
ахыр:ахыр            T2-Adv ;
бабайир:бабайир         T3-Adv ;
бабудый:бабудый         T1-Adv ;
бавын:бавын           T3-Adv ;
бавэди:бавэди          T3-Adv ;
байир:байир           T3-Adv ;
бали:бали            T3-Adv ;
банхуэй:банхуэй         T3-Adv ;
барабир:барабир         T1-Adv ;
буду:буду            Adv ;
буцун:буцун           Adv ;

LEXICON NumYan
баван:баван           Num ;



LEXICON NounsYan2
вагон:вагон           N-NN ;
вазы:вазы            T1-N-NN ;
вальс:вальс           T3-N-NN ;
ванфан:ванфан          T2-N-NN ;
ванхуэй:ванхуэй         T2-N-NN ;
ванщи:ванщи           T2-N-NN ;
вику:вику            T3-N-NN ;
вонфа:вонфа           T1-N-NN ;
вуфан:вуфан           T2-N-NN ;
вухуэй:вухуэй          T2-N-NN ;
вынти:вынти           T3-N-NN ;
вынщен:вынщен          N-NN ;
вынщён:вынщён          N-NN ;
газ:газ             T2-N-NN ;
ганцо:ганцо           T1-N-NN ;
гитара:гитара          T1-N-NN ;
гмин:гмин            N-NN ;
годи:годи            T1-N-NN ;
голён:голён           T1-N-NN ;
гонте:гонте           T1-N-NN ;
гончён:гончён          T1-N-NN ;
гр:гр              N-NN ;
грамм:грамм           T1-N-NN ;
гуамян:гуамян          T3-N-NN ;
гуанщи:гуанщи          T1-N-NN ;
гунсы:гунсы           T1-N-NN ;
гунхуэй:гунхуэй         T1-N-NN ;
гунхэгуй:гунхэгуй        N-NN ;
гуон:гуон            N-NN ;
дазы:дазы            T1-N-NN ;
дайи:дайи            T3-N-NN ;
далу:далу            N-NN ;
дамый:дамый           T3-N-NN ;
дансы:дансы           T3-N-NN ;
даш:даш             N-NN ;
дезы:дезы            T2-N-NN ;
дуй:дуй             N-NN ;
дэфу:дэфу            T3-N-NN ;
дян:дян             N-NN ;
дянч:дянч            N-NN ;
жынзў:жынзў           T1-N-NN ;
ёнй:ёнй             N-NN ;
җегэ:җегэ            N-NN ;
җёй:җёй             N-NN ;
җёл:җёл             N-NN ;
җёмын:җёмын           T3-N-NN ;

LEXICON NounsAnYan2
вуню:вуню            T2-N-AN ;
вэгуйжын:вэгуйжын        T3-N-AN ;
вэжын:вэжын           T3-N-AN ;
гвазы:гвазы           N-AN ;
гуан:гуан            N-AN ;
ехўзы:ехўзы           T2-N-AN ;
җёйан:җёйан           N-AN ;

LEXICON VerbsYan2
ва:ва              V ;
винон:винон           T1-V ;
ган:ган             V ;
го:го              V ;
гуа:гуа             V ;
гунщи:гунщи           T1-V ;
де:де              V ;
дон:дон             V ;
жан:жан             V ;
жо:жо              V ;
жон:жон             V ;
ё:ё               T1-V ;
җейин:җейин           T1-V ;

LEXICON AdjYan2
вэгуй:вэгуй           T3-N-NN ;
га:га              T1-Adj ;
гэ:гэ              N-AN ;
гэг:гэг             N-AN ;
даг:даг             N-AN ;
дянщин:дянщин          N-NN ;
җе:җе              N-AN ;

LEXICON AdvYan2
виса:виса            T3-Adv ;
ганзо:ганзо           T1-Adv ;



LEXICON NounsYan3
вазелин:вазелин         T1-N-NN ;
варцэ:варцэ           T2-N-NN ;
ватуди:ватуди          N-NN ;
ваё:ваё             T2-N-NN ;
вонжын:вонжын          T1-N-NN ;
вулищэн:вулищэн         N-NN ;
вынху:вынху           T3-N-NN ;
выншын:выншын          T1-N-NN ;
вынщэн:вынщэн          N-NN ;
гамузы:гамузы          T1-N-NN ;
ганхан:ганхан          T1-N-NN ;
ганша:ганша           N-NN ;
геология:геология        T1-N-NN ;
геометрия:геометрия       T1-N-NN ;
гибизы:гибизы          N-NN ;
гонзы:гонзы           N-NN ;
гонлин:гонлин          T1-N-NN ;
гуанси:гуанси          N-NN ;
гуанцэ:гуанцэ          T1-N-NN ;
гуйлянзы:гуйлянзы        T2-N-NN ;
гуйтэ:гуйтэ           N-NN ;
гуйчын:гуйчын          T1-N-NN ;
гундан:гундан          T1-N-NN ;
гунтян:гунтян          T1-N-NN ;
гунфу:гунфу           T1-N-NN ;
гунфын:гунфын          T1-N-NN ;
гунчин:гунчин          T1-N-NN ;
гуонго:гуонго          T2-N-NN ;
гур:гур             T3-N-NN ;
гутун:гутун           T1-N-NN ;
гуэвэн:гуэвэн          N-NN ;
гуэгун:гуэгун          T2-N-NN ;
гуэзы:гуэзы           T2-N-NN ;
гўдуй:гўдуй           T3-N-NN ;
гўдун:гўдун           N-NN ;
гўлэ:гўлэ            N-NN ;
гўран:гўран           N-NN ;

LEXICON NounsAnYan3
вуба:вуба            T2-N-AN ;
вуйижын:вуйижын         T2-N-AN ;
вэму:вэму            N-AN ;
вэсунзы:вэсунзы         T3-N-AN ;
голижын:голижын         T1-N-AN ;
гуафу:гуафу           N-AN ;
гувазы:гувазы          N-AN ;
гуйтузы:гуйтузы         T1-N-AN ;
гулян:гулян           T1-N-AN ;
гунгун:гунгун          T1-N-AN ;
гунлоң:гунлоң          N-AN ;
гунлуң:гунлуң          N-AN ;
гунсызы:гунсызы         T1-N-AN ;
гуэпезы:гуэпезы         T2-N-AN ;
гўгу:гўгу            N-AN ;
гўма:гўма            T1-N-AN ;
гўфу:гўфу            T1-N-AN ;
гўца:гўца            T1-N-AN ;

LEXICON VerbsYan3
васуй:васуй           T1-V ;
вичу:вичу            V ;
вузон:вузон           T2-V ;
вучон:вучон           T1-V ;
вэфу:вэфу            T3-V ;
гаха:гаха            V ;
гогуэ:гогуэ           T2-V ;
гуннэ:гуннэ           V ;
гунён:гунён           V ;
гўша:гўша            V ;

LEXICON AdjYan3
вуку:вуку            T1-Adj ;
вунэ:вунэ            Adj ;
выннян:выннян          T3-N-NN ;
вынян:вынян           N-NN ;
голу:голу            T1-N-NN ;
гуанзы:гуанзы          N-NN ;
гуонтан:гуонтан         T1-N-NN ;
гуэчон:гуэчон          T2-N-NN ;
гўсуй:гўсуй           T1-N-NN ;


LEXICON T1-N-NN
%<n%>%<nn%>%<t1%>:  NounEnd ;

LEXICON T1-N-AN
%<n%>%<an%>%<t1%>:  T1-N-AN-Num ;

LEXICON T1-N-AN-Num
%<sg%>:        NounEnd ;
%<pl%>:%>му    NounEnd ;

LEXICON T1-V
%<vblex%>%<t1%>:  VAspSlot ;

LEXICON T1-Adj
%<adj%>%<t1%>:  AdjDeg ;

LEXICON T1-Adv
%<adv%>%<t1%>:  # ;

LEXICON T2-N-NN
%<n%>%<nn%>%<t2%>:  NounEnd ;

LEXICON T2-N-AN
%<n%>%<an%>%<t2%>:  T2-N-AN-Num ;

LEXICON T2-N-AN-Num
%<sg%>:        NounEnd ;
%<pl%>:%>му    NounEnd ;

LEXICON T2-V
%<vblex%>%<t2%>:  VAspSlot ;

LEXICON T2-Adj
%<adj%>%<t2%>:  AdjDeg ;

LEXICON T2-Adv
%<adv%>%<t2%>:  # ;

LEXICON T3-N-NN
%<n%>%<nn%>%<t3%>:  NounEnd ;

LEXICON T3-N-AN
%<n%>%<an%>%<t3%>:  T3-N-AN-Num ;

LEXICON T3-N-AN-Num
%<sg%>:        NounEnd ;
%<pl%>:%>му    NounEnd ;

LEXICON T3-V
%<vblex%>%<t3%>:  VAspSlot ;

LEXICON T3-Adj
%<adj%>%<t3%>:  AdjDeg ;

LEXICON T3-Adv
%<adv%>%<t3%>:  # ;

LEXICON YanZ_adj_t1
йидяр:йидяр           T1-Adj ;
йиҗынянди:йиҗынянди       T1-Adj ;
куйви:куйви           T1-Adj ;
LEXICON YanZ_n_t1
йибян:йибян           T1-N-NN ;
капитализм:капитализм      T1-N-NN ;
LEXICON YanZ_n_t2
зунли:зунли           T2-N-NN ;
йүн:йүн             T2-N-NN ;
кўхо:кўхо            T2-N-NN ;
LEXICON YanZ_n_t3
зўхади:зўхади          T3-N-NN ;
кукур:кукур           T3-N-NN ;
LEXICON YanZ_vblex_t1
зыйҗи:зыйҗи           T1-V ;
ку:ку              T1-V ;
лаҗинчи:лаҗинчи         T1-V ;
LEXICON YanZ_vblex_t2
зухундё:зухундё         T2-V ;
йиҗыдё:йиҗыдё          T2-V ;
кудо:кудо            T2-V ;
LEXICON YanZ_vblex_t3
зўбянйи:зўбянйи         T3-V ;
зўщи:зўщи            T3-V ;
каншон:каншон          T3-V ;
LEXICON Yan5_adj_t1
донбинди:донбинди        T1-Adj ;
люлынзы:люлынзы         T1-Adj ;
нанщин:нанщин          T1-Adj ;
санцынзы:санцынзы        T1-Adj ;
фоншанзы:фоншанзы        T1-Adj ;
чинлёнлёрди:чинлёнлёрди     T1-Adj ;
шыбутуди:шыбутуди        T1-Adj ;
щёнхади:щёнхади         T1-Adj ;
җюдуанди:җюдуанди        T1-Adj ;
LEXICON Yan5_adj_t2
дуандуарди:дуандуарди      T2-Adj ;
либянди:либянди         T2-Adj ;
лёнчянди:лёнчянди        T2-Adj ;
мыйчи:мыйчи           T2-Adj ;
нянҗян:нянҗян          T2-Adj ;
санпыйзы:санпыйзы        T2-Adj ;
сыщён:сыщён           T2-Adj ;
фонкуэди:фонкуэди        T2-Adj ;
шудихади:шудихади        T2-Adj ;
щүхади:щүхади          T2-Adj ;
юшылиди:юшылиди         T2-Adj ;
җунпонпонди:җунпонпонди     T2-Adj ;
LEXICON Yan5_adj_t3
додорвын:додорвын        T3-Adj ;
дёдёди:дёдёди          T3-Adj ;
лёдёди:лёдёди          T3-Adj ;
мын:мын             T3-Adj ;
нанҗинчиди:нанҗинчиди      T3-Adj ;
нэхурди:нэхурди         T3-Adj ;
понлынлынди:понлынлынди     T3-Adj ;
сучи:сучи            T3-Adj ;
футурди:футурди         T3-Adj ;
цуан:цуан            T3-Adj ;
щищён:щищён           T3-Adj ;
җуаншу:җуаншу          T3-Adj ;
LEXICON Yan5_n_t1
дидон:дидон           T1-N-NN ;
линлё:линлё           T1-N-NN ;
масўсў:масўсў          T1-N-NN ;
мыйцэ:мыйцэ           T1-N-NN ;
нёнлозы:нёнлозы         T1-N-NN ;
сангынни:сангынни        T1-N-NN ;
фачир:фачир           T1-N-NN ;
хўҗё:хўҗё            T1-N-NN ;
шыван:шыван           T1-N-NN ;
янщүнзы:янщүнзы         T1-N-NN ;
җүнчи:җүнчи           T1-N-NN ;
LEXICON Yan5_n_t2
елизы:елизы           T2-N-NN ;
лояту:лояту           T2-N-NN ;
малў:малў            T2-N-NN ;
мянбулё:мянбулё         T2-N-NN ;
нүчинҗя:нүчинҗя         T2-N-NN ;
тобэ:тобэ            T2-N-NN ;
фипуто:фипуто          T2-N-NN ;
чүнчүнзы:чүнчүнзы        T2-N-NN ;
җунзы:җунзы           T2-N-NN ;
LEXICON Yan5_n_t3
дизорхуар:дизорхуар       T3-N-NN ;
дунбудё:дунбудё         T3-N-NN ;
жуцы:жуцы            T3-N-NN ;
муфу:муфу            T3-N-NN ;
нэхур:нэхур           T3-N-NN ;
суан:суан            T3-N-NN ;
тэпин:тэпин           T3-N-NN ;
хандянзы:хандянзы        T3-N-NN ;
чуондондон:чуондондон      T3-N-NN ;
янмыйгэ:янмыйгэ         T3-N-NN ;
LEXICON Yan5_nan_t1
дунҗя:дунҗя           T1-N-AN ;
линзыцо:линзыцо         T1-N-AN ;
люсуйди:люсуйди         T1-N-AN ;
малор:малор           T1-N-AN ;
муҗён:муҗён           T1-N-AN ;
нынчынжын:нынчынжын       T1-N-AN ;
разый:разый           T1-N-AN ;
теҗижын:теҗижын         T1-N-AN ;
хибар:хибар           T1-N-AN ;
чижын:чижын           T1-N-AN ;
шыжын:шыжын           T1-N-AN ;
щүнфан:щүнфан          T1-N-AN ;
җимин:җимин           T1-N-AN ;
LEXICON Yan5_nan_t2
егу:егу             T2-N-AN ;
еҗүлү:еҗүлү           T2-N-AN ;
лонэнэ:лонэнэ          T2-N-AN ;
лынбонбонзы:лынбонбонзы     T2-N-AN ;
мифи:мифи            T2-N-AN ;
муҗи:муҗи            T2-N-AN ;
нүвазы:нүвазы          T2-N-AN ;
созы:созы            T2-N-AN ;
харвани:харвани         T2-N-AN ;
челян:челян           T2-N-AN ;
щёца:щёца            T2-N-AN ;
җўщи:җўщи            T2-N-AN ;
LEXICON Yan5_nan_t3
дуймыр:дуймыр          T3-N-AN ;
дынзазы:дынзазы         T3-N-AN ;
луан:луан            T3-N-AN ;
мифуҗон:мифуҗон         T3-N-AN ;
нонбизы:нонбизы         T3-N-AN ;
сўхуа:сўхуа           T3-N-AN ;
фоннюва:фоннюва         T3-N-AN ;
хынжыр:хынжыр          T3-N-AN ;
шонбучи:шонбучи         T3-N-AN ;
щянзы:щянзы           T3-N-AN ;
ёнетеди:ёнетеди         T3-N-AN ;
җюе:җюе             T3-N-AN ;
LEXICON Yan5_vblex_t1
дё:дё              T1-V ;
монбый:монбый          T1-V ;
нэлян:нэлян           T1-V ;
сылёнхо:сылёнхо         T1-V ;
фудё:фудё            T1-V ;
чинхуон:чинхуон         T1-V ;
шыю:шыю             T1-V ;
ёхуэйлэ:ёхуэйлэ         T1-V ;
җынҗанбэ:җынҗанбэ        T1-V ;
LEXICON Yan5_vblex_t2
дасо:дасо            T2-V ;
дыншон:дыншон          T2-V ;
луй:луй             T2-V ;
нёха:нёха            T2-V ;
соҗин:соҗин           T2-V ;
ханчелэ:ханчелэ         T2-V ;
шоншы:шоншы           T2-V ;
янщи:янщи            T2-V ;
җынхо:җынхо           T2-V ;
LEXICON Yan5_vblex_t3
дочўлэ:дочўлэ          T3-V ;
жынчынха:жынчынха        T3-V ;
лёщёнчелэ:лёщёнчелэ       T3-V ;
нядо:нядо            T3-V ;
сунги:сунги           T3-V ;
фонсун:фонсун          T3-V ;
че:че              T3-V ;
щяха:щяха            T3-V ;
җищёнчелэ:җищёнчелэ       T3-V ;
